District of Columbia statutes.
20-351

General.

If the property of a decedent subject to administration in the District of Columbia has a value of $40,000 or less, the property may be administered as a small estate in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(q), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 901, 48 DCR 2087

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 13-292 provided: “Sec. 1102. Applicability. For the purposes of Title 5 and Title 9 and sections 801(b), 805, and 806 of Title 8 of this act, the provisions relating to the administration of decedents’ estates shall apply only to the estates of decedents who die on or after the effective date of this act.”

D.C. Law 13-292 substituted “$40,00” for “$15,000”.
1981 Ed., § 20-351.